Illinois, session 104th, SB345.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Conveyance and Encumbrance of Manufactured 5Homes as Real Property and Severance Act is amended by 6changing Section 5-1 as follows: 7    (765 ILCS 170/5-1)8    Sec. 5-1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 9Conveyance and Encumbrance of Manufactured Homes as Real 10Property and Severance Act. All references in this Article to 11"this Act" mean this Article.12(Source: P.A. 98-749, eff. 7-16-14.)